test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_kaarbis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - käärbis: # MLO, ok 
    käärbis+N+Sg+Nom:  käärbis
    käärbis+N+Sg+Gen:  kárbá
    käärbis+N+Sg+Acc:  kárbá
    käärbis+N+Sg+Ill:  kárbás
    käärbis+N+Sg+Loc:  kárbást
    käärbis+N+Sg+Com:  kárbáin
    käärbis+N+Sg+Abe:  kárbáttáá 
    käärbis+N+Ess:  kärbisin
    käärbis+N+Par:  kärbisid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Nom:  kárbáh
    käärbis+N+Pl+Gen:  kárbái
    käärbis+N+Pl+Acc:  kárbáid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Ill:  kárbáid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Loc:  kárbáin
    käärbis+N+Pl+Com:  [kárbáiguin, kárbáigijn]
    käärbis+N+Pl+Abe:  kárbáittáá

  Noun - riegis: # MLO, ok 
    riegis+N+Sg+Nom:  riegis
    riegis+N+Sg+Gen:  riäggá
    riegis+N+Sg+Acc:  riäggá
    riegis+N+Sg+Ill:  riäggás
    riegis+N+Sg+Loc:  riäggást
    riegis+N+Sg+Com:  riäggáin
    riegis+N+Sg+Abe:  [riägáttáá, riäggáttáá]
    riegis+N+Ess:  riegisin
    riegis+N+Par:  riegisid
    riegis+N+Pl+Nom:  riäggáh
    riegis+N+Pl+Gen:  riäggái
    riegis+N+Pl+Acc:  riäggáid
    riegis+N+Pl+Ill:  riäggáid
    riegis+N+Pl+Loc:  riäggáin
    riegis+N+Pl+Com:  [riäggáiguin, riäggáigijn]
    riegis+N+Pl+Abe:  riäggáittáá

  Noun - lääbis: # MLO, ok 
    lääbis+N+Sg+Nom:  lääbis
    lääbis+N+Sg+Gen:  lábbá
    lääbis+N+Sg+Acc:  lábbá
    lääbis+N+Sg+Ill:  lábbás
    lääbis+N+Sg+Loc:  lábbást
    lääbis+N+Sg+Com:  lábbáin
    lääbis+N+Sg+Abe:  [lábáttáá, lábbáttáá]
    lääbis+N+Ess:  läbisin
    lääbis+N+Par:  läbisid
    lääbis+N+Pl+Nom:  lábbáh
    lääbis+N+Pl+Gen:  lábbái
    lääbis+N+Pl+Acc:  lábbáid
    lääbis+N+Pl+Ill:  lábbáid
    lääbis+N+Pl+Loc:  lábbáin
    lääbis+N+Pl+Com:  [lábbáiguin, lábbáigijn]
    lääbis+N+Pl+Abe:  lábbáittáá

  Noun - päälgis: # MLO, ok
    päälgis+N+Sg+Nom:  päälgis
    päälgis+N+Sg+Gen:  pálgá
    päälgis+N+Sg+Acc:  pálgá
    päälgis+N+Sg+Ill:  pálgás
    päälgis+N+Sg+Loc:  pálgást
    päälgis+N+Sg+Com:  pálgáin
    päälgis+N+Sg+Abe:  pálgáttáá
    päälgis+N+Ess:  pälgisin
    päälgis+N+Par:  pälgisid
    päälgis+N+Pl+Nom:  pálgáh
    päälgis+N+Pl+Gen:  pálgái
    päälgis+N+Pl+Acc:  pálgáid
    päälgis+N+Pl+Ill:  pálgáid
    päälgis+N+Pl+Loc:  pálgáin
    päälgis+N+Pl+Com:  [pálgáiguin, pálgáigijn]
    päälgis+N+Pl+Abe:  pálgáittáá

  Noun - čyegis: # MLO, ok 
    čyegis+N+Sg+Nom:  čyegis
    čyegis+N+Sg+Gen:  čuággá
    čyegis+N+Sg+Acc:  čuággá
    čyegis+N+Sg+Ill:  čuággás
    čyegis+N+Sg+Loc:  čuággást
    čyegis+N+Sg+Com:  čuággáin
    čyegis+N+Sg+Abe:  [čuágáttáá, čuággáttáá]
    čyegis+N+Ess:  čyegisin
    čyegis+N+Par:  čyegisid
    čyegis+N+Pl+Nom:  čuággáh
    čyegis+N+Pl+Gen:  čuággái
    čyegis+N+Pl+Acc:  čuággáid
    čyegis+N+Pl+Ill:  čuággáid
    čyegis+N+Pl+Loc:  čuággáin
    čyegis+N+Pl+Com:  [čuággáiguin, čuággáigijn]
    čyegis+N+Pl+Abe:  čuággáittáá
    
